District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.53

Stay of proceedings.

If the corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the Superior Court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court consider appropriate.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-305.57.

Section References